Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1246.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 743. Temperature Control Standards.--(a) A school entity shall maintain a temperature-controlled environment that is conducive to learning in the school entity's facilities by:(1) To the greatest extent possible, maintaining room temperatures within the target range of sixty-eight (68) degrees Fahrenheit to seventy-nine (79) degrees Fahrenheit in all occupied areas of a facility.(2) Measuring the temperature of an occupied area of a 12345678910111213141516171819 facility when a temperature outside the target range is suspected, which measurement shall be taken in the area where the greatest temperature extreme is expected to occur.(3) Relocating students and staff from an occupied area with a recorded temperature below sixty-three (63) degrees Fahrenheit or above eighty-nine (89) degrees Fahrenheit within two (2) hours of the temperature measurement.(4) Reporting a temperature-related relocation within twenty-four (24) hours to the Department of Environmental Protection in a manner determined by the Department of Environmental Protection.(b) The Department of Environmental Protection shall conduct an inspection of a school entity's facility from which students and staff were relocated more than four (4) times in a school year under subsection (a) to ensure that the facility meets state indoor air quality standards.(c) A school entity shall review and implement, to the extent feasible and appropriate and to the extent permitted by local building and fire codes, temperature control measures, including:(1) Short term measures for excessive cold weather, such as using portable space heaters, relocating students to areas of a school entity's facility at or above sixty-three (63) degrees Fahrenheit and increasing access to sunlight.(2) Long term measures for excessive cold weather, such as the installation of permanent heating equipment and energy-efficient windows, using programmable thermostats and enhancing the maintenance of heating equipment.(d) As used in this section, the term "school entity" means a school district, charter school, regional charter school, 20250HB1246PN1395 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 intermediate unit or area career and technical school operating within this Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1246PN1395 - 3 - 123